incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
    <pardef n="/καλός__adj">
      <e><p><l>καλύτερος</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλή</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλής</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλή</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλή</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλές</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλών</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλές</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλές</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλός</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλού</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλό</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλέ</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλοί</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλών</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλούς</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλοί</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλό</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλού</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλό</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλό</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλά</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλών</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλά</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>καλά</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άριστος</l><r>καλός<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="φρ/όνιμος__adj">
      <e><p><l>ονιμότερος</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμη</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμης</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμη</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμη</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμες</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμων</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμες</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμες</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμος</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμου</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμο</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμε</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμοι</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμων</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμους</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμοι</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμο</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμου</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμο</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμο</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμα</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμων</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμα</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όνιμα</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ονιμότατος</l><r>όνιμος<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="σταχτ/ής__adj">
      <e><p><l>ιά</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιάς</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιά</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιά</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιές</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιών</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιές</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιές</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ής</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιού</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ή</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ή</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιοί</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιών</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιούς</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιοί</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ί</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιού</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ί</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ί</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιά</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιών</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιά</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιά</l><r>ής<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="θαλασσής"><i>θαλασσ</i><par n="σταχτ/ής__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="καλός"><i></i><par n="/καλός__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="σταχτής"><i>σταχτ</i><par n="σταχτ/ής__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="φρόνιμος"><i>φρ</i><par n="φρ/όνιμος__adj"/></e>
